Nebraska, session 109, LB429.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Certificated employee has the same meaning as in section 79-824; and
(b) Professional employees' organization means any organization that
engages in one or more of the following activities: Providing liability
protection or collective bargaining on behalf of certificated employees.
(2) A school board shall grant access upon a request made by a
professional employees' organization to the physical or electronic mailbox of
any certificated employee.
(3) A professional employees' organization, in an effort to recruit new
members, is permitted to display information at or send a representative who
either is an employee of the school district or represents an employee of the
school district to attend a certificated employee meeting or event, including,
but not limited to, a certificated employee orientation meeting.
(4) If a professional employees' organization is allowed to create and
post signage or materials in a school such as an information board, a bulletin
board, a poster, or a pamphlet, any other professional employees' organization
shall also be granted permission to create and post signage and materials in an
equal manner.
(5) A school board shall not designate any day or break in the school
calendar by naming or referring to the day or break using the name of any
professional employees' organization.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to, modify,
supersede, or affect in any way the provisions of the Industrial Relations Act,
section 48-842, or any rights, duties, procedures, or obligations established
pursuant to such act or section, including, but not limited to, any matters
relating to collective bargaining, industrial disputes, certification of
bargaining agents, prohibited practices, or jurisdiction of the Commission of
Industrial Relations.
-1-